dev/proper-noun/proper-noun.bn.dix
    <pardef n="সুভাষ__np_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="nom"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            ও
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="nom"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ও__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            কেও
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="obj"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ও__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            ের
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="gen"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            কেই
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="obj"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ই__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            কে
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="obj"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            েরও
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="gen"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ও__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            ই
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="nom"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ই__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            েরই
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="gen"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ই__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="দীপ__np_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="nom"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            ও
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="nom"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ও__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            কেও
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="obj"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ও__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            ের
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="gen"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            কেই
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="obj"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ই__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            কে
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="obj"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            েরও
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="gen"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ও__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            ই
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="nom"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ই__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            েরই
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="m"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="gen"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ই__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="জয়া__np_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="f"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="nom"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            ও
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="f"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="nom"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ও__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            কেও
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="f"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="obj"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ও__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            র
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="f"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="gen"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            কেই
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="f"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="obj"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ই__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            কে
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="f"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="obj"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            রও
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="f"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="gen"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ও__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            ই
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="f"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="nom"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ই__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>
            রই
          </l>
          <r>
            <s n="np"/>
            <s n="f"/>
            <s n="ant"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
            <s n="gen"/>
            <j/>
            <par n="ই__enclitic"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="সুভাষ">
      <i>
        সুভাষ
      </i>
      <par n="সুভাষ__np_m"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="দীপ">
      <i>
        দীপ
      </i>
      <par n="দীপ__np_m"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="জয়া">
      <i>
        জয়া
      </i>
      <par n="জয়া__np_f"/>
    </e>
